Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 11. Liability for Injury or Death of Persons Unlawfully Ridingon Railroad

§ 37-9-1101.
Injury or death of persons unlawfully riding on railroads; immunities.

Except in cases of attractive nuisance, no person owning, operating, loading or unloading a railroad car or train shall be liable for any damages for the accidental death or injury of a person occurring while the person was riding the railroad car or train in violation of W.S.

37-12-104

, or while the person was boarding or unboarding from the railroad car or train without the consent of the owner or operator of the railroad car or train.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 200, § 1.

Quoted

in

Thunder Hawk ex rel. Jensen v. Union Pac. R.R., 844 P.2d 1045,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 1992); Thunder Hawk v. Union Pac. R.R., 891 P.2d 773,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1995).